Hawaii statutes.
§711-1109.1 Authority to enter
premises; notice of impoundment of animal; damage resulting from entry. (1)
If there is probable cause to believe that a pet animal or equine animal is
being subjected to treatment in violation of section 711-1108.5, 711-1109,
711-1109.3, or 711-1109.35, as applicable, a law enforcement officer, after
obtaining a search warrant, or in any other manner authorized by law, may enter
the premises where the pet animal or equine animal is located to provide the
pet animal or equine animal with food, water, and emergency medical treatment
or to impound the pet animal or equine animal. If after reasonable effort, the
owner or person having custody of the pet animal or equine animal cannot be
found and notified of the impoundment, an impoundment notice shall be
conspicuously posted on the premises and within seventy-two hours after
posting, the notice shall be sent by certified mail to the address, if any,
from which the pet animal or equine animal was removed.

(2) A law enforcement officer is not liable
for any damage resulting from an entry under subsection (1), unless the damage
resulted from intentional or reckless behavior on behalf of the law enforcement
officer.

(3) A court may order a pet animal or equine
animal impounded under subsection (1) to be held at a duly incorporated humane
society or duly incorporated society for the prevention of cruelty to animals.
A facility receiving the pet animal or equine animal shall provide adequate
food and water and may provide veterinary care.

(4) For purposes of this section, "law
enforcement officer" shall have the same meaning as [in] section 710-1000.
[L 2006, c 239, pt of §1; am L 2007, c 114, §5; am L 2008, c 128, §§2, 7; am L
2009, c 11, §15 as superseded by c 160, §3; am L 2011, c 149, §§2, 6; am L
2012, c 25, §1]

Note

The repeal and reenactment note at subsection (1) in the main
volume took effect on July 1, 2015, pursuant to L 2008, c 128, §7; L 2009, c
160, §3; and L 2011, c 149, §6.

Case Notes

Defendant, an officer of the Hawaii Island Humane Society,
had authority under state law to apply for and execute the search warrant. 947
F. Supp. 2d 1087 (2013).

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next